Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,126
Required approvals.

(MBCA 9.02) (a) If a
domestic or foreign business corporation or eligible entity may not be a party
to a merger without the approval of the Attorney General, the Department of
Banking and Finance, the Department of Insurance, or the Public Service Commission,
the corporation or eligible entity shall not be a party to a transaction under
sections 21-2,125 to 21-2,149 without the prior approval of that agency.

(b) Property held in
trust or for charitable purposes under the laws of this state by a domestic
or foreign eligible entity shall not, by any transaction under sections 21-2,125
to 21-2,149, be diverted from the objects for which it was donated, granted,
or devised unless and until the eligible entity obtains an order of the court
specifying the disposition of the property to the extent required by and pursuant
to cy pres or other nondiversion law of this state.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 126.